Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 2
CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION TRUST FUND

26.5-3-201. Short title.

The short title of this part 2 is the "Colorado Child Abuse Prevention Trust Fund Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 606, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-202. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that:

Child abuse and neglect are a threat to the family unit and impose major expenses on society;

There is a need to assist private and public agencies in identifying, planning, and establishing statewide programs for the prevention of child abuse and neglect; and

The types of trauma experienced by children who are under eighteen years of age include childhood emotional, physical, and sexual abuse; emotional and physical neglect; housing insecurity and poverty; and household challenges, including growing up in a household with substance abuse, mental health disorders, violence, or parental incarceration. Adverse childhood experiences such as these have been shown to have a lifelong impact on health, behavior, and age of mortality.

It is the purpose of this part 2 to promote primary and secondary prevention programs that are designed to prevent child trauma and maltreatment before it occurs, lessen the occurrence of child abuse and neglect, and mitigate the impacts of adverse childhood experiences to reduce the need for state intervention through child welfare actions and economic support for families experiencing poverty.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 606, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-102 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the Colorado child abuse prevention board created in section 26.5-3-204.

"Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

"Child abuse" has the meaning as provided for the term "abuse" in section 19-1-103 (1).

"Prevention program" means a program of direct child abuse prevention services for a child, parent, or guardian and includes research or education programs related to the prevention of child abuse. Such a prevention program may be classified as a primary prevention program when it is available to the community on a voluntary basis and as a secondary prevention program when it is directed toward groups of individuals who have been identified as high risk.

"Recipient" means and is limited to a nonprofit or public organization that receives a grant from the trust fund.

"Trust fund" means the Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund created in section 26.5-3-206.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 607, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-3-204. Colorado child abuse prevention board - creation - members - terms - vacancies.

The Colorado child abuse prevention board is transferred to the department of early childhood from the department of human services. The board shall exercise its powers and duties as if transferred by a type 2 transfer. Persons appointed to the board continue serving until completion of their terms and may be reappointed as provided in this section.

The board consists of nineteen members, with a consideration for geographic diversity, as follows:

One person from the department of human services' division of child welfare, appointed by the executive director of the department of human services;

The executive director of the department of early childhood or the executive director's designee;

The executive director of the department of public health and environment or the executive director's designee;

The commissioner of education or the commissioner's designee;

Three persons appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate who are knowledgeable in the area of child abuse prevention and represent some of the following areas: Law enforcement, medicine, law, business, public policy, mental health, intimate partner violence, early childhood education, elementary and secondary education, reducing poverty and helping families gain economic stability, the connection between housing instability and trauma, higher education, research and program evaluation, and social work. In making appointments to the board, the governor is encouraged to include representation by at least one member who is a person with a disability, as defined in section 24-34-301 (2.5), a family member of a person with a disability, or a member of an advocacy group for persons with disabilities, so long as the other requirements of this subsection (2)(e) are met.

The executive director of the department of health care policy and financing or the executive director's designee;

The executive director of the department of local affairs or the executive director's designee;

The child protection ombudsman, as appointed pursuant to section 19-3.3-102;

Four appointees who represent county leadership, as either a county commissioner or a director of public health or of human or social services, as designated by statewide organizations representing county commissioners, human services directors, and public health officials, three of whom must have expertise in human services or child welfare practice;

Three members appointed by the executive director of the department. Such appointees must be community members with lived experience that may include childhood history of adverse childhood experiences or experience participating in prevention, parenting, or family strengthening programs. One of the three appointees must be a parent.

One member who is a member of the senate and who is appointed by the president of the senate and one member who is a member of the house of representatives and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

Each appointed member of the board serves a term of three years.

The original appointing entity shall fill a vacancy on the board for the balance of the board member's unexpired term.

A board member, whether original or otherwise, may not serve more than two consecutive terms.

The board shall meet regularly and adopt its own rules of procedure.

Except as provided in section 2-2-326, members serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 607, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-103 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-205. Powers and duties of the board.

The board has the following powers and duties:

To advise and make recommendations to the governor, state agencies, and other relevant entities concerning the implementation of and future revisions to any state plan developed to prevent child maltreatment;

To develop strategies and monitor efforts to achieve:

Increases in child well-being and achievement;

Increases in caregiver well-being and achievement;

Increases in consistent high-quality caregiving;

Increases in safe, supportive neighborhoods and communities; and

Decreases in the incidence of child maltreatment and child maltreatment fatalities;

To assist public and private agencies in coordinating efforts on behalf of families, including securing funding and additional investments for services and programs, and improving access to these services for children and their families;

To provide for the coordination and exchange of information concerning the establishment and maintenance of primary and secondary prevention programs and to facilitate the exchange of information between groups concerned with child maltreatment;

To identify opportunities for, and barriers to, the alignment of standards, rules, policies, and procedures across programs and agencies that support families. The board shall submit recommendations developed pursuant to this subsection (1)(e)(I) to the department, which shall then include such recommendations as part of its presentation to its committee of reference at a hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" in January 2022.

The board shall also provide ongoing recommendations on changes to enhance the alignment and provision of services and supports for families to prevent child trauma and maltreatment to appropriate government and nonprofit agencies and policy boards.

To collaborate with other relevant boards, commissions, and councils that exist within the executive branch to address services and supports for families;

To promote academic research on the efficacy and cost-effectiveness of child maltreatment prevention initiatives;

To distribute money and make grant awards from the Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund, created in section 26.5-3-206, in accordance with section 26.5-3-207 and for:

The establishment, promotion, and maintenance of primary and secondary child maltreatment prevention programs, including pilot programs or services identified in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse and programs that are under evaluation for purposes of petitioning the federal government for inclusion in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse;

Programs to prevent child sexual abuse;

Programs to reduce the occurrence of prenatal substance exposure;

Programs to reduce the occurrence of other adverse childhood experiences;

Programs to reduce poverty or help families get out of poverty;

Programs to create housing stability; and

Operational expenses of the board, including allowable expenses pursuant to section 26.5-3-204 (5);

To monitor and promote the interaction and seamless partnership between the office within the department of human services that is responsible for children, youth, and families and the department in administering family strengthening programs;

To accept grants from the federal government, as well as to solicit and accept contributions, grants, gifts, bequests, and donations from individuals, private organizations, and foundations; and

To exercise or perform any other powers or duties consistent with the purposes for which the board was created and that are reasonably necessary for the fulfillment of the board's responsibilities as set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 609, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-104 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-206. Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund - creation - source of funds.

There is created in the state treasury the Colorado child abuse prevention trust fund. The board shall administer the trust fund, which consists of:

Money transferred into the trust fund in accordance with section 13-32-101 (5)(a)(I);

Money collected by the board pursuant to section 26.5-3-205 (1)(j) from federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests, and donations. Such money must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the trust fund;

Any money appropriated to the trust fund by the state; and

Reimbursement money received for prevention services and programs identified in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse pursuant to the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018". Beginning July 1, 2021, the department shall transmit federal Title IV-E reimbursements for prevention services to the state treasurer, who shall credit the reimbursements to the trust fund.

The board shall claim federal Title IV-E reimbursement for the trust fund for all eligible grants for prevention services on the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse.

Money in the trust fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly. Any money remaining in the trust fund must not be transferred to or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year. Any interest earned on the investment or deposit of money in the trust fund must also remain in the fund and must not be credited to the general fund of the state.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 610, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-105 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-207. Disbursement of grants from the trust fund - restrictions.

Grants may be awarded to provide money for the start-up, continuance, or expansion of primary or secondary prevention programs, including pilot programs and educational programs for professionals and the public, and to study and evaluate primary and secondary prevention programs. In addition, grants may be awarded for programs to prevent and reduce the occurrence of prenatal substance exposure and an evidence-based or research-based child sexual abuse prevention training model to prevent and reduce the occurrence of child sexual abuse.

The distribution of money credited to the trust fund by reimbursement for prevention services and programs identified in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse must fund programs and services that align with the state's prevention strategy, pursuant to the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018", including consideration of variable needs and resources across the state and data-driven approaches, and be informed by the department in consultation with county departments of human or social services and other entities that deliver the eligible services or programs. Eligible services or programs may include those under evaluation for the purposes of petitioning the federal government for inclusion in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse; except that, if the service or program at the time of federal review is rated to not meet criteria for inclusion in the federal Title IV-E prevention services clearinghouse, money credited to the trust fund by reimbursement for prevention services must not be allocated for that purpose in the next fiscal year, unless there is an evaluation of the service or program already underway that will build substantial new evidence that has the potential to change the service or program rating, or the service or program has been submitted to the federal clearinghouse for re-review.

The board has discretion to oversee the disbursement of money from the trust fund to ensure its appropriate use and make recommendations for the total grant amount to be awarded each year.

The board shall not authorize any grant awards pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for political, election, or lobbying purposes.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 611, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-106 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-208. Report - repeal of part.

The department shall contract for an independent evaluation of the trust fund, including administrative costs of operating the trust fund and the cost-effectiveness and the impact of the grants on reducing and preventing child abuse. The department shall provide a report of the evaluation to the house of representatives and senate health and human services committees, or any successor committees, on or before November 1, 2026.

This part 2 is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 612, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 19-3.5-107 as it existed prior to 2022.